src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! # conjunctions

LEXICON cc
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag **+CC**
+CC: # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains 10 or so.
ta cc "ja" ;
o cc "ja" ;
elle cc "tai, vai" ;
bi cc "mutta, vaan" ;
ja cc "ja" ;
sekä cc "sekä" ;
tai cc "tai" ;
vai cc "vai" ;
mutta cc "mutta" ;
vaan cc "vaan" ;
